Maine, session 132, LD864.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §954, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §14, is further
amended to read:
5. Transporter. A garage owner, towing business, business that sells or services camp
trailers or motor homes, body shop, finance company, bank, motor vehicle auction
business, motor vehicle rental company, recycler or repossession company licensed by the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau of Consumer Credit
Protection or any public or nonprofit organization as described in section 951, subsection
4 may be issued transporter plates and a license to transport a vehicle, including a trailer,
owned by or in the custody of that owner or business.
A. The holder may use this plate only if the vehicle is accompanied by the owner or
the owner's employee.
B. A transporter plate may not be:
(1) Used in lieu of registration plates;
(2) Loaned to another;
(3) Used for personal reasons; or
(4) Used on a towing vehicle, except for a drive-away saddlemount vehicle
transporter combination.
C. The holder may charge a fee for the transport of a vehicle under this subsection.